Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.190

Notice—Contents.

The form of the notice of infraction issued under this chapter shall include the following:

(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in this chapter;

(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;

(3) A statement of the specific infraction for which the notice was issued;

(4) A statement of the monetary penalty that has been established for the infraction;

(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these options;

(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may subpoena witnesses, including the authorized representative of the department who issued and served the notice of infraction; and

(7) A statement that the person must respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways provided in this chapter.

A statement that failure to timely select one of the options for responding to the notice of civil infraction after receiving a statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the notice of infraction and the procedures necessary to exercise these options is a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine or imprisonment in jail.

[ 2006 c 270 s 9; 1994 c 174 s 4; 1983 c 124 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 174: See note following RCW 18.106.020.

Effective date—1983 c 124: See note following RCW 18.106.020.